Missouri, session 2026, HB1625.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 579.022, 579.065, and 579.068, RSMo, are repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 579.022, 579.065, and 579.068,
to read as follows:
579.022. 1. A person commits the offense of delivery of a controlled substance
causing death if a person delivers or distributes a controlled substance under section 579.020
[knowing such substance is mixed with another controlled substance] and a death results from
the use of such controlled substance.
2. It shall not be a defense that the user contributed to the user's own death by using
the controlled substance or consenting to the administration of the controlled substance by
another.
3. The offense of delivery of a controlled substance causing death is a class A felony.
4. For purposes of this section, "controlled substance" means a Schedule I or
Schedule II controlled substance, as defined in section 195.017.
579.065. 1. A person commits the offense of trafficking drugs in the first degree if,
except as authorized by this chapter or chapter 195, such person knowingly distributes,
delivers, manufactures, produces or attempts to distribute, deliver, manufacture or produce:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1625 2
(1) More than thirty grams of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount
of heroin;
(2) More than one hundred fifty grams of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which
cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been removed; cocaine salts
and their optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers; ecgonine, its derivatives, their
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of any of the foregoing substances;
(3) More than five hundred milligrams of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD);
(4) More than thirty grams of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount
of phencyclidine (PCP);
(5) More than four grams of phencyclidine;
(6) More than thirty kilograms of a mixture or substance containing marijuana;
(7) More than thirty grams of any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
containing any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central
nervous system: amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers and salts of its optical isomers;
methamphetamine, its salts, optical isomers and salts of its optical isomers; phenmetrazine
and its salts; or methylphenidate;
(8) More than thirty grams of any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine;
(9) One gram or more of flunitrazepam for the first offense;
(10) Any amount of gamma-hydroxybutyric acid for the first offense; [or]
(11) More than [ten] three milligrams of fentanyl [or carfentanil], or any derivative
thereof, [or any combination thereof,] or any compound, mixture, or substance containing a
detectable amount of fentanyl [or carfentanil], or [their] its optical isomers or analogues; or
(12) Any amount of carfentanil.
2. The offense of trafficking drugs in the first degree is a class B felony.
3. The offense of trafficking drugs in the first degree is a class A felony if the quantity
involved is:
(1) Ninety grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
heroin; or
(2) Four hundred fifty grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which
cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been removed; cocaine salts
and their optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers; ecgonine, its derivatives, their

HB 1625 3
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of any of the foregoing substances; or
(3) One gram or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD); or
(4) Ninety grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
phencyclidine (PCP); or
(5) Twelve grams or more of phencyclidine; or
(6) One hundred kilograms or more of a mixture or substance containing marijuana;
or
(7) Ninety grams or more of any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
containing any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central
nervous system: amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers and salts of its optical isomers;
methamphetamine, its salts, optical isomers and salts of its optical isomers; phenmetrazine
and its salts; or methylphenidate; or
(8) More than thirty grams of any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
containing any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central
nervous system: amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical isomers;
methamphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical isomers; phenmetrazine
and its salts; or methylphenidate, and the location of the offense was within two thousand feet
of real property comprising a public or private elementary, vocational, or secondary school,
college, community college, university, or any school bus, in or on the real property
comprising public housing or any other governmental assisted housing, or within a motor
vehicle, or in any structure or building which contains rooms furnished for the
accommodation or lodging of guests, and kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out to
the public as a place where sleeping accommodations are sought for pay or compensation to
transient guests or permanent guests; or
(9) Ninety grams or more of any material, compound, mixture or preparation which
contains any quantity of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(10) More than thirty grams of any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
which contains any quantity of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine and the location of the
offense was within two thousand feet of real property comprising a public or private
elementary, vocational, or secondary school, college, community college, university, or any
school bus, in or on the real property comprising public housing or any other governmental
assisted housing, within a motor vehicle, or in any structure or building which contains rooms
furnished for the accommodation or lodging of guests, and kept, used, maintained, advertised,
or held out to the public as a place where sleeping accommodations are sought for pay or
compensation to transient guests or permanent guests; or

HB 1625 4
(11) One gram or more of flunitrazepam for a second or subsequent offense; or
(12) Any amount of gamma-hydroxybutyric acid for a second or subsequent offense;
or
(13) [Twenty] Fourteen milligrams or more of fentanyl [or carfentanil], or any
derivative thereof, [or any combination thereof,] or any compound, mixture, or substance
containing a detectable amount of fentanyl [or carfentanil], or [their] its optical isomers or
analogues; or
(14) More than five hundredths of a milligram of carfentanil.
579.068. 1. A person commits the offense of trafficking drugs in the second degree
if, except as authorized by this chapter or chapter 195, such person knowingly possesses or
has under his or her control, purchases or attempts to purchase, or brings into this state:
(1) More than thirty grams of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount
of heroin;
(2) More than one hundred fifty grams of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which
cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been removed; cocaine salts
and their optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers; ecgonine, its derivatives, their
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of any of the foregoing substances;
(3) More than five hundred milligrams of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD);
(4) More than thirty grams of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount
of phencyclidine (PCP);
(5) More than four grams of phencyclidine;
(6) More than thirty kilograms of a mixture or substance containing marijuana;
(7) More than thirty grams of any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
containing any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central
nervous system: amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers and salts of its optical isomers;
methamphetamine, its salts, optical isomers and salts of its optical isomers; phenmetrazine
and its salts; or methylphenidate;
(8) More than thirty grams of any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine; [or]
(9) More than [ten] three milligrams of fentanyl [or carfentanil], or any derivative
thereof, [or any combination thereof,] or any compound, mixture, or substance containing a
detectable amount of fentanyl [or carfentanil], or [their] its optical isomers or analogues; or
(10) Any amount of carfentanil.
2. The offense of trafficking drugs in the second degree is a class C felony.

HB 1625 5
3. The offense of trafficking drugs in the second degree is a class B felony if the
quantity involved is:
(1) Ninety grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
heroin; or
(2) Four hundred fifty grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which
cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been removed; cocaine salts
and their optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers; ecgonine, its derivatives, their
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains
any quantity of any of the foregoing substances; or
(3) One gram or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD); or
(4) Ninety grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
phencyclidine (PCP); or
(5) Twelve grams or more of phencyclidine; or
(6) One hundred kilograms or more of a mixture or substance containing marijuana;
or
(7) More than five hundred marijuana plants; or
(8) Ninety grams or more but less than four hundred fifty grams of any material,
compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of the following substances
having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system: amphetamine, its salts, optical
isomers and salts of its optical isomers; methamphetamine, its salts, optical isomers and salts
of its optical isomers; phenmetrazine and its salts; or methylphenidate; or
(9) Ninety grams or more but less than four hundred fifty grams of any material,
compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of 3,4-
methylenedioxymethamphetamine; or
(10) [Twenty] Fourteen milligrams or more of fentanyl [or carfentanil], or any
derivative thereof, [or any combination thereof,] or any compound, mixture, or substance
containing a detectable amount of fentanyl [or carfentanil], or [their] its optical isomers or
analogues; or
(11) More than five hundredths of a milligram of carfentanil.
4. The offense of trafficking drugs in the second degree is a class A felony if the
quantity involved is four hundred fifty grams or more of any material, compound, mixture or
preparation which contains:
(1) Any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central
nervous system: amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers and salts of its optical isomers;

HB 1625 6
methamphetamine, its salts, isomers and salts of its isomers; phenmetrazine and its salts; or
methylphenidate; or
(2) Any quantity of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine.
5. The offense of drug trafficking in the second degree is a class C felony for the first
offense and a class B felony for any second or subsequent offense for the trafficking of less
than one gram of flunitrazepam.
✔